src/numeral-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part 
 NAMÁK ;			   ! tuvsánjienat, logigielat, etc. 
 SASJ ; 
! NounSecond ;	! golmmačiegahas	
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;	   
! !tuvsán#geardásaš 
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ; 


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON VUOSTASJ      				
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;          
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;         
 +Sg+Acc:%>av K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:%>in K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:%>is K ;            
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;            
 +Ess:%>in K ;                  
 +Pl+Nom:%>a K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn K ;                
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs K ;                 
 +Pl+Com:%>ij K ;                 
 +Attr:%> K ;					

LEXICON TUVSÁNAT				
 +Sg+Nom:t%> K ;          
 +Sg+Gen:tta%> K ;         
 +Sg+Acc:tta%>v K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:dda%>j K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:tta%>n K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:tta%>s K ;            
 +Sg+Com:tta%>jn K ;            
 +Ess:dda%>n K ;                  
 +Pl+Nom:tta%> K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:tta%>j K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:tta%>jt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:tta%>jda K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:tta%>jn K ;                
 +Pl+Ela:tta%>js K ;                 
 +Pl+Com:tta%>j K ;                 
 +Attr:t%> K ;					
 
! Collection numbers
! ---------------

LEXICON GUOVTES           
 +Sg+Gen:á%> K ;          
 +Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;                 
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;                     
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;                 
 +Sg+Ela:á%>s K ;                 
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;                    
 +Ess:á%>n K ;                    
 +Pl+Nom:á%> K ;                  
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;                 
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;                
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;                   
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;                        
 +Pl+Ela:á%>js K ;                        
 +Pl+Com:á%>j K ;                         
 +Sg+Nom:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Gen:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Acc:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Ill:á%>s PxCi ;      
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n PxC ;      
 +Sg+Ela:á%>st PxC ;     
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn PxC ;      
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j PxC ;      
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jd PxC ;     
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jdis PxC ;        
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn PxC ;     
 +Pl+Ela:á%>jst PxC ;        
 +Pl+Com:á%>j PxC ;      


LEXICON VIDÁS           
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;          
 +Sg+Acc:%>av K ;                 
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;                     
 +Sg+Ine:%>in K ;                 
 +Sg+Ela:%>is K ;                 
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;                    
 +Ess:%>in K ;                    
 +Pl+Nom:%>a K ;                  
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;                 
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt K ;                
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;                   
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn K ;                        
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs K ;                        
 +Pl+Com:%>ij K ;                         
 +Sg+Nom:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Ill:%>as PxCs ;      
 +Sg+Ine:%>in PxCs ;      
 +Sg+Ela:%>ist PxCs ;     
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn PxCs;      
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij PxCs ;      
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd PxCs ;     
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdas PxC ;        
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn PxCs ;     
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijst PxCs ;        
 +Pl+Com:%>ij PxCs ;      


LEXICON VIDÁSLÅGENAN                        
 +Sg+Gen:%>a#lågenan%> K ;      
 +Sg+Acc:%>av#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Sg+Ine:%>in#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:%>is#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Par:%>it#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Nom:%>a#lågenan%> K ;                      
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn#lågenan%> K ;                    
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs#lågenan%> K ;                        
 +Pl+Com:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;                     
 
LEXICON TJUODAGIS                       
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;                          
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>j K ;                                       
 +Sg+Gen:á%> K ;                          
 +Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;                         
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;                         
 +Sg+Ela:á%>s K ;                                     
 +Pl+Nom:á%> K ;                                  
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;                                         
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;                            
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;                       
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;                                    
 +Pl+Ela:á%>js K ;                                
 +Pl+Com:á%>j K ;                                     
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;                            
 +Sg+Nom:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>s PxCi ;      
 +Sg+Gen:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Acc:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n PxC ;       
 +Sg+Ela:á%>st PxC ;      
 +Pl+Nom:á%> PxNomPlV ;       
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j PxC ;       
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jd PxC ;      
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jdis PxCs ;       
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn PxC ;      
 +Pl+Ela:á%>jst PxC ;     
 +Pl+Com:á%>j PxC ;       
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn PxC ;        



! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

LEXICON máŋŋgacase           
 +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;                
 +Sg+Acc:%>v K ;      
 +Sg+Ela:%>s K ;      
 +Sg+Ine:%>n K ;   
 +Sg+Part:%>t K ;     

LEXICON ållocase           
 +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>v K ;      
 +Sg+Ela:%>s K ;      
 +Sg+Ine:%>n K ;   
 +Sg+Com:%>jn K ;         
 +Sg+Part:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jt K ;      
 +Pl+Ela:%>js K ;      
 +Pl+Ine:%>jn K ;   
 +Pl+Com:%>j K ;         





! Arabic numerals
! ---------------


LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES				!!^C^
 §+Use/Circ:§ ARABIC;      ! §24			!
 §§+Use/Circ:§§ ARABIC;     ! §§24			!
 §% +Use/Circ:§%  ARABIC;    ! § 24			!
 §§% +Use/Circ:§§%  ARABIC;   ! §§ 24			!
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC;     ! -24			!
 %‒+Use/Circ:%‒ ARABIC;     ! -24 U
 %–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC;     ! -24 U
 %—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC;     ! -24 U
 %―+Use/Circ:%― ARABIC;     ! -24 U
 %++Use/Circ:%+ ARABIC;     ! <plus>24			!
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC;	! - 24			!
 %‒% +Use/Circ:%‒%  ARABIC;	! - 24 2012		!
 %–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC;	! - 24 2013	 	!
 %—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC;	! - 24 2014		!
 %―% +Use/Circ:%―%  ARABIC;	! - 24 2015 		!
 %+% +Use/Circ:%+%  ARABIC;	! <plus> 24			!
 %*+Use/Circ:%* ARABIC;     ! *24			!
 %$+Use/Circ:%$ ARABIC;     ! $24  ! And the Euro?	!
 %<+Use/Circ:%< ARABIC;     ! <24			!
 %>+Use/Circ:%>7	ARABIC ;     ! >24			!
 s%.+Use/Circ:s%. ARABIC;     ! s.24			!
	


LEXICON ARABIC					!^C^			
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] >   ARABICLOOP ;	!^C^		
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] >   ARABICLOOPORD ;	!^C^		
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] >   ARABICLOOPCOLL ;	!^C^		


LEXICON ARABICLOOP				!^C^
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;					!
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC;	      ! 1-2    multipart numbers	!
 %.%-+Use/Circ:%.%- ARABIC;	      ! 1.-2   multipart numbers	!
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC;	      ! 1- 2   multipart numbers	!
 % %-+Use/Circ:% %- ARABIC;	      ! 1 -2   multipart numbers	!
 % %-% +Use/Circ:% %-%  ARABIC;	      ! 1 - 2  multipart numbers	!
 % %-%-% +Use/Circ:% %-%-%  ARABIC;	      ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers	!
 % %-+Use/Circ:% %- ARABICDELIMITER;   ! 1 -   multipart numbers		!
 % %-%-+Use/Circ:% %-%- ARABICDELIMITER;   ! 1 --  multipart numbers		!
 %.+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC;							!
 %,+Use/Circ:%, ARABIC;							!
 %+Use/Circ: ARABIC ;							!
 % +Use/Circ:%  ARABIC;	   ! Allowing for "23 500". !			
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;	   ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (initial char is alt-space)	!
 %/+Use/Circ:%/ ARABIC;	   ! 24/12			!		
!%' ARABIC ;	   ! Since ' denotes cons.grad. This is not optimal either. 
!+Num:%- R ; !^C^	   	! Number compounds
 +Num+Use/Circ: R ; 			   	! Hyphen removed bec. of "123- ja 124-viessu" !
!+A+Ord:%. # ;							 !^C^
 ,%-+Num+Use/Circ:,%- # ;			! 10,-					 !
 %%+Num+Nom+Use/Circ:%% # ;		! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".		!
 % %%+Num+Nom+Use/Circ:% %% # ;	! We must analyse the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.	!
 +Num+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters			!

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD				!^C^
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%. # ;							 !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERORD ;                    !

LEXICON LÅGENAN					
lågenan#nuppát+A+Ord:lågenan#nuppád9 VUOSTASJ ;       
guovtes#lågenan+N+Coll:guoktás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       
gålmås#lågenan+N+Coll:gålmmås VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;        
lågenan#nælját+A+Ord:lågenan#næljád9 VUOSTASJ ;        
nieljes#lågenan+N+Coll:nælljás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       
vidás#lågenan+N+Coll:vihttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   
guđás#lågenan+N+Coll:guhttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       
lågenan#gudát+A+Ord:lågenan#gudád9 VUOSTASJ ;        
gietjas#lågenan+N+Coll:giehtjas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       
gávtses#lågenan+N+Coll:gáktsás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;        
avtses#lågenan+N+Coll:aktsás# VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       
lågenan#gávtsát+A+Ord:lågenan#gávtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;       
nuppát#lågåt+A+Ord:nuppát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;        
gudát#lågåt+A+Ord:gudát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;        
lågenan#guovtes+N+Coll:lågenan#guoktás VIDÁS ;    
lågenan#guovtes+N+Coll:lågenan#guokt GUOVTES ;    
lågenan#gålmås+N+Coll:lågenan#gålmmås VIDÁS ;        
lågenan#nieljes+N+Coll:lågenan#nælljás VIDÁS ;       
lågenan#viđás+N+Coll:lågenan#vihttas VIDÁS ;       
lågenan#guđás+N+Coll:lågenan#guhttas VIDÁS ;      
lågenan#gietjas+N+Coll:lågenan#giehtjas VIDÁS ;       
lågenan#gávtses+N+Coll:lågenan#gáktsás VIDÁS ;        
lågenan#avtses+N+Coll:lågenan#aktsás VIDÁS ;       
LEXICON COLLECTIVE    !Some collective numbers that do not fit in anywhere else
gålmmågis+N+Coll:gålmmågis TJUODAGIS ;           
vihttagis+N+Coll:vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
giehtjagis+N+Coll:giehtjagis TJUODAGIS ;             
aktsegis+N+Coll:aktsegis TJUODAGIS ;         
neljuk+N+Coll:neljug9 VUOSTASJ ;  
nielje#lågåk+N+Coll:nielje#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gávtse#lågåk+N+Coll:gávtse#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
guokta#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:guokta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guok#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:guok#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;    
niellja#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:niellja#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;   
vihtta#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:vihtta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gietjav#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:gietjav#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;   
gietja#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:gietja#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;       
gáktse#låk#vihttagis+N+Coll:gáktse#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guokta#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:guokta#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guok#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:guok#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
niellja#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:niellja#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;    
vihtta#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:vihtta#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gietjav#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:gietjav#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;   
gietja#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:gietja#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;       
gáktse#låge#vihttagis+N+Coll:gáktse#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
tjuodagis+N+Coll:tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guovte#tjuodak+N+Coll:guovte#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;			
guovte#tjuodagis+N+Coll:guovte#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;     
nielje#tjuodagis+N+Coll:nielje#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gudá#tjuodak+N+Coll:gudá#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gudá#tjuodagis+N+Coll:gudá#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gávtse#tjuodagis+N+Coll:gávtse#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;     
tjuohte#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gålmmå#tjuode#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:gålmmå#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
guok#tjuot#vidá#lågåk+Num:guok#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
niellje#tjuot#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:niellje#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
gålmmå#tjuohte#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:gålmmå#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;		
gallagis+N+Coll:gallagis TJUODAGIS ;  
gietjagis+N+Coll:gietjagis TJUODAGIS ;
gáktsegis+N+Coll:gáktsegis TJUODAGIS ;
guhtta#tjuode#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:guhtta#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
vihtta#tjuohte#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:vihtta#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;		
giehtja#tjuohte#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:giehtja#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
gietja#tjuot#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:gietja#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
aktse#tjuode#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:aktse#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;	
gáktsa#tjuohte#vidá#lågåk+N+Coll:gáktsa#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;	
LEXICON num-imprecise
máŋŋga+Num:máŋga máŋŋgacase ;
moadda+Num:moatte máŋŋgacase ;
ållo+Num:ålo ållocase ;
bielle#goalmát+A+Ord:bielle#goalmád9 VUOSTASJ ;              
bielle#vidát+A+Ord:bielle#vidád9 VUOSTASJ ;
bielle#giehttjit+A+Ord:bielle#giehttjid9 VUOSTASJ ;              
bielle#avtsát+A+Ord:bielle#avtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;              
